Washington statutes.
RCW 10.58.020

Presumption of innocence—Conviction of lowest degree, when.

Every person charged with the commission of a crime shall be presumed innocent until the contrary is proved by competent evidence beyond a reasonable doubt; and when an offense has been proved against him or her, and there exists a reasonable doubt as to which of two or more degrees he or she is guilty, he or she shall be convicted only of the lowest.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1053; 1909 c 249 s 56; 1891 c 28 s 91; Code 1881 s 767; 1854 p 76 s 3; RRS s 2308. Formerly RCW 10.58.020 and 10.61.020.]

NOTES:

Conviction of attempts or lesser or included crimes: RCW 10.61.003, 10.61.006, 10.61.010.